Massachusetts, session 194th, H2258.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 328 of the acts of 1926, as most recently amended by chapter 26 of the acts of
2000, is hereby further amended by inserting after section 5H the following section:-
Section 5I. The board of water commissioners may recommend improvements on private
property, with prior written approval of the property owners, and seek funds by vote of the
district, to protect and enhance the quality of the water supply for the benefit of the residents of
Cotuit.
of 1